Oklahoma, session 2025, SB416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.6, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 1290.6.

PROHIBITED AMMUNITION

Any concealed or unconcealed handgun when carried in a manner

authorized by the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and

when loaded with any ammunition which is either a restricted bullet

as defined by Section 1289.19 of this title or is larger than .45

caliber or is otherwise prohibited by law shall be deemed a

prohibited weapon for purposes of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be

punished for a criminal offense as provided by Section 1272 of this

title or any other applicable provision of law. In addition to any

Req. No. 997 Page 1

crim inal prosecution for a violation of the provisions of this

section, the licensee shall be subject to an administrative fine of

Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), upon a hearing and determination by

the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation that the person is in

violation of the provisions of this section.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-997 CN 1/14/2025 3:51:11 PM

































Req. No. 997 Page 2